Hawaii, session 2025, SB405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: "(b)  The agenda required to be included in written public notice of a neighborhood board meeting may include an opportunity for the board to receive public input and third‑party reports from any government official on issues not specifically noticed for consideration at the forthcoming meeting. (c)  Any matter raised as part of the public input agenda or third-party reports from any government official allowed under subsection (b) may be discussed and information on the matter may be received by the board at the meeting; provided that the board shall not make a decision relating to [the matter.] any of those matters.  The board may make decisions on matters originally raised as part of a public input agenda item or raised by a third-party report from any government official only at a later meeting, where the agenda for the meeting shall give notice of decision-making on the matter." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.